New York, session 2025-2026, S6032.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2589 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2589. New York city lunch leftover take-home meal pilot program. 1. 4 The chancellor of the New York city department of education shall estab- 5 lish a pilot program for the purpose of providing frozen take-home meals 6 to certain children located in the city of New York. The chancellor of 7 the New York city department of education shall select one New York city 8 public school from each borough to participate in the pilot program. 9 Students from schools selected to participate in the pilot program shall 10 have the option to sign up for such program and the principals of the 11 participating schools shall determine how many children to accept into 12 the pilot program. Participating schools shall administer the pilot 13 program which shall include, but shall not be limited to, making frozen 14 take-home meals from unused and unopened leftover food from participat- 15 ing schools. Such meals shall be distributed to children who have been 16 accepted into such pilot program. Such pilot program shall be imple- 17 mented for a period of one full school year. 18 2. The chancellor of the New York city department of education shall 19 promulgate rules to implement the requirements of this section. 20 3. The principal of each participating school shall submit a report to 21 the chancellor of the New York city department of education detailing 22 all data collected by such principal relating to the pilot program for 23 review and full implementation. Such reports shall be submitted no more 24 than thirty days after the completion of the school year. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10646-01-5 S. 6032 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 2 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 3 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 4 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 5 on or before such effective date.